Hawaii statutes.
§88-122 Determination of employer normal
cost and accrued liability contributions. (a) Based on regular interest
and such mortality and other tables as are adopted by the board of trustees,
the actuary engaged by the board, on the basis of successive annual actuarial
valuations, shall determine the employer's normal cost and accrued liability
contributions for each fiscal year beginning July 1 separately for the
following two groups of employees:

(1) Police officers, firefighters, and corrections
officers; and

(2) All other employees.

(b) The actuarial valuations shall be based on
the contribution rates approved by the legislature, and the tables,
assumptions, and factors adopted by the board for actuarial valuations of the
system; provided that the investment yield rate assumption for the year ending
June 30, 2011, shall be seven and three-quarters per cent.

(c) With respect to each of the two groups of
employees in subsection (a), the normal cost for each year after June 30, 1994,
shall be the percentage of the aggregate annual compensation of employees as of
March 31 of the valuation year as determined by the actuary using the entry age
normal cost funding method. On each June 30 the board shall determine the
allocation of the assets of the pension accumulation fund between the two
groups of employees in subsection (a); provided that the assets of the pension
accumulation fund as of June 30, 1976, shall be allocated between the two
groups in the same proportion as the aggregate annual compensation of each
group as of March 31, 1976.

(d) Commencing with fiscal year 1994-1995 and
each subsequent fiscal year, the actuary shall determine the total unfunded
accrued liability using the entry age normal cost funding method separately for
each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a). The accrued liability
contribution for each of the two groups of employees shall be the annual
payment required to liquidate the unfunded accrued liability over a period of
twenty-nine years beginning July 1, 2000. Any increase or decrease in the
total unfunded accrued liability resulting from legislative changes in the
benefit provisions of the employees' retirement system shall be liquidated over
a period of time to be determined by the actuary.

(e) Commencing with fiscal year 2005-2006 and
each subsequent fiscal year, the employer contributions for normal cost and
accrued liability for each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a)
shall be based on fifteen and three-fourths per cent of the member's compensation
for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and thirteen and
three-fourths per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.
Commencing with fiscal year 2008-2009 and each subsequent fiscal year until
fiscal year 2011-2012, the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued
liability for each of the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be
based on nineteen and seven-tenths per cent of the member's compensation for
police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and fifteen per cent of
the member's compensation for all other employees. In fiscal year 2012-2013,
the employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of
the two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-two per
cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and
corrections officers and fifteen and one-half per cent of the member's
compensation for all other employees. In fiscal year 2013-2014, the employer
contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups
of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-three per cent of the
member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and corrections
officers and sixteen per cent of the member's compensation for all other
employees. In fiscal year 2014-2015, the employer contributions for normal
cost and accrued liability for each of the two groups of employees in
subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-four per cent of the member's compensation
for police officers, firefighters, and corrections officers and sixteen and
one-half per cent of the member's compensation for all other employees.
Commencing with fiscal year 2015-2016 and each subsequent fiscal year, the
employer contributions for normal cost and accrued liability for each of the
two groups of employees in subsection (a) shall be based on twenty-five per
cent of the member's compensation for police officers, firefighters, and
corrections officers and seventeen per cent of the member's compensation for
all other employees. The contribution rates shall amortize the total unfunded
accrued liability of the entire plan over a period not to exceed thirty years.

The contribution rates shall be subject to
adjustment:

(1) If the actual period required to amortize the
unfunded accrued liability exceeds thirty years;

(2) If there is no unfunded accrued liability; or

(3) Based on the actuarial investigation conducted in
accordance with section 88-105. [L 1925, c 55, pt of §8; am imp L 1927, c 251,
§4; am L 1933, c 181, §3; am L Sp 1933, c 10, §§2, 3; RL 1935, pt of §7927; am
L 1935, c 48, §§2, 4; RL 1945, pt of §712, subs 3; RL 1955, §6-89; am L 1964, c
62, §12; am L 1965, c 222, §15; HRS §88-113; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; am L
1973, c 19, §1; am L 1977, c 171, §2 and c 191, §2; am L 1981, c 201, §1; am L
1982, c 147, §6; am L 1983, c 190, §1; am L 1985, c 128, §1; gen ch 1985; am L
1987, c 291, §1; am L 1988, c 41, §7; am L 1989, c 184, §1; am L 1991, c 170,
§1; am L 1993, c 144, §1; am L 1994, c 276, §9; am L 1996, c 79, §1; am L 1997,
c 327, §3; am L 1998, c 151, §1; am L 2001, c 104, §1; am L 2002, c 147, §2; am
L 2004, c 181, §2; am L 2007, c 256, §3; am L 2011, c 163, §§16, 22]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next